Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-2606
Packer violation; proceeds of livestock sale; fines; distribution.

The proceeds from any livestock ordered to be sold pursuant to section 54-2605 shall not be distributed until all fines and costs associated with such action have been paid. All money collected as a fine shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the permanent school fund. All fines levied under this section remaining unpaid shall constitute a debt to the State of Nebraska which may be collected by lien foreclosure or sued for and recovered in any proper form of action, in the name of the State of Nebraska, in the district court of the county in which the violation occurred.

Laws 1999, LB 835, § 6.